Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska66-1341
Application; information confidential.

Trade secrets, academic and scientific research work, and other proprietary or commercial information which may be filed with an application for a grant or loan or other financial assistance shall not be considered to be public records as defined in section 84-712.01 if the release of such trade secrets, work, or information would give advantage to business competitors and serve no public purpose. Any person seeking release of the trade secrets, work, or information as a public record shall demonstrate to the satisfaction of the board that the release would not violate this section.

Laws 1989, LB 587, § 14;

R.S.1943, (1990), § 66-1321.01;

Laws 1993, LB 364, § 12.